Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 1 Composition of Senate
22-1-2.
Districts.

The state is hereby divided into thirty-eight (38) senatorial districts bounded and described as follows:

It is understood and intended that for the purpose of this section a line described as running on, on, to or through any street (including road, avenue, lane, way, parkway, expressway, divided highway, state route or interstate route, or trail), stream or river, is intended to mean the center line of that street, stream or river, and a line described as the shoreline is intended to mean the line on the mean low water level, and a feature extension is intended to mean the imaginary straight-line extension from the end of a map feature, usually a street or road, to another feature, as for example, from the end of a dead-end street to a nearby river, in all instances, unless it shall be otherwise specified.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts described in this section shall be composed of United States census geography (tracts and blocks), as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau, whose boundaries correspond to the below metes and bounds set forth in this section and which are hereby made a part of this chapter. A listing of which census blocks are contained within each district shall be deemed to be incorporated by reference.

It is further understood and intended that for the purpose of this section, the districts will be depicted on thirty-nine (39) maps known as Senate Plan D — Substitute A, compiled by Election Data Services, Inc. for each city and town, and hereinafter may be referred to as town maps.

The secretary of state shall keep a copy of each set of the foregoing maps and a copy of the census tract and block listing available for inspection during ordinary business hours at his or her office. The secretary of state shall furnish each city and town a copy of the town map covering that particular city or town within ten (10) days from the passage of this act.

For purposes of this title, references to “tract” or “CT” shall mean “census tract,” as that demographic unit is established by the United States Bureau of the census for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau. References to “block,” “blocks,” or “block groups,” refer to those demographic units as established by the United States Census Bureau for the 2020 census as described by maps and publications of the bureau.

Any reference to a “city or town,” “city or town boundaries,” or “city or town limits” shall refer to the boundaries or limits of the particular city or town as defined by the 2020 version of the “TIGER” files from the United States Census Bureau.

In the census tract and block listing, the first two (2) digits of a census description shall refer to the State of Rhode Island (44), the next three (3) digits of a census description shall refer to the county in which the district lies. Bristol county carries the code 001; Kent county carries the code 003; Newport county carries the code 005; Providence county carries the code 007; and Washington county carries the code 009. The next six (6) digits refer to the census tract within the county set forth in the description. The last four (4) digits refer to the census block within the census tract. “TIGER” is an acronym for the computer readable geographic data base that automates the mapping and related geographic activities required to support the United States’ Census Bureau’s census and survey programs and stands for “Topologically Integrated Geographic Encoding and Referencing.”

If any census tract, block, block group, or enumeration district is omitted, listed more than once, or is only partially provided for, it is intended that the districts be defined in such a manner as to not omit any area of Rhode Island from a district and to comply with the standard of Articles VII and VIII of the Rhode Island Constitution requiring that districts be reasonably equal. In order to carry out the intent of the general assembly as expressed in this section the secretary of state shall, if necessary, undertake measures to insure compliance with this section.

In the event of a discrepancy between the metes and bounds description, the description of census tracts and blocks, and the maps which shall be on file with the secretary of state, then the listing of census tracts and blocks shall take precedence and be controlling.

First district:
The first senatorial district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the I-95 ramp and Memorial Blvd; thence easterly on Memorial Blvd to Exchange St; thence northwesterly on Exchange St to Railroad St; thence northeasterly on Railroad St to the eastern boundary line of Providence Amtrak Station and the New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence northerly on New York New Haven and Hartford RR to I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly on the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to Branch Ave; thence westerly on Branch Ave to Moy St; thence southerly on Moy St to Concannon St; thence westerly on Concannon St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to River Ave; thence southerly on River Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence northeasterly on Chalkstone Ave to Lisbon St; thence southeasterly on Lisbon St to Berkley St; thence southwesterly on Berkley St to Robin St; thence southeasterly on Robin St to Prescott St; thence northeasterly on Prescott St to Wolcott St; thence southeasterly on Wolcott St to Valley St; thence northeasterly on Valley St to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence southeasterly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to Woonasquatucket River; thence easterly on Woonasquatucket River to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Second district:
The second senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at I-95 and the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence westerly and northwesterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to Webster Ave; thence northerly on Webster Ave to Plainfield St; thence westerly on Plainfield St to Ralph St; thence northerly on Ralph St to Eastwood Ave; thence westerly on Eastwood Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Hartford Ave; thence easterly on Hartford Ave to US Highway 6; thence southeasterly and northerly on US Highway 6 to Westminster St; thence easterly on Westminster St to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to census block 440070013004007 thence southerly and westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070013004000 — 440070013004007, 440070013004006 — 440070013004008 and 440070013004001 — 440070013004009 to Willow St; thence westerly on Willow St to Ellery St; thence southerly on Ellery St to Chapin Ave; thence easterly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Ford St; thence easterly on Ford St to Bucklin St; thence southerly on Bucklin St to Bellevue Ave; thence easterly on Bellevue Ave to Plenty St; thence easterly on Plenty St to Broad St; thence southwesterly on Broad St to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Third district:
The third senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Hope St and the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly on the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary to the Providence Harbor and the line extending from the Providence River; thence northwesterly on the Providence River to the Moshassuck River; thence northerly on the Moshassuck River to Charles St; thence northerly on Charles St to Stevens St; thence easterly on Stevens St to Hewes St; thence northeasterly on Hewes St to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to Olney St; thence easterly on Olney St to Camp St; thence northeasterly on Camp St to Carrington Ave; thence easterly on Carrington Ave to Hope St; thence northeasterly on Hope St to the point of origin.

Fourth district:
The fourth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line and Smithfield Road; thence southeasterly on Smithfield Rd to census block 440070121043001; thence southerly, easterly and westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121043002 — 440070121043001, 440070121043002 — 440070121043000, 440070121043002 440070119021003, 440070121043002 — 440070121043019, 440070121043002 — 440070121043011 and 440070121043002 — 440070121043005 to Bicentennial Way; thence westerly on Bicentennial Way to Locust Ave; thence southerly on Locust Ave to Jacksonia Dr; thence westerly on Jacksonia Dr to Joslin St; thence southerly on Joslin St to census block 440070121032014; thence easterly and southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121032014 — 440070121032013 to census block 440070121032015; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070121032014 — 440070121032015 to the intersection of Walter Ave and Joslin St; thence southerly on Joslin St to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to Howard Ave; thence southerly on Howard Ave to Hobson Ave; thence southwesterly on Hobson Ave to Dewey Ave; thence southerly on Dewey Ave to Smith St; thence easterly on Smith St to Atlantic Blvd; thence southwesterly on Atlantic Blvd to Swan St; thence southeasterly on Swan St to Sykes St; thence westerly and southerly on Sykes St to Intervale Ave; thence easterly on Intervale Ave to Cranberry Rd; thence southerly on Cranberry Rd to Humbert St; thence westerly on Humbert St to Greenville Ave; thence southerly on Greenville Ave to Lyman Ave; thence westerly on Lyman Ave to Woonasquatucket Ave; thence northerly on Woonasquatucket Ave to Testa Dr; thence westerly on Testa Dr and its extension to the Johnston — North Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Johnston — North Providence boundary line to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northerly on the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to the line extending from Sudbury St; thence westerly on Sudbury St to Augusta Ave; thence northerly on Augusta Ave to Young St; thence westerly on Young St to Palm St; thence northerly on Palm St to Monticello St; thence southwesterly on Monticello St to Woodward Rd; thence southerly on Woodward Rd to Angell Rd; thence westerly on Angell Rd to Benjamin Dr; thence westerly on Benjamin Dr to Evergreen Pkwy; thence northerly on Evergreen Pkwy to census block 440070119022003; thence northerly and westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070119022003 — 440070119023000 to Angell Rd; thence northerly on Angell Rd to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Smithfield — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

The fourth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — North Providence boundary line and State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to Branch Ave; thence westerly on Branch Ave to Moy St; thence southerly on Moy St to Concannon St; thence westerly on Concannon St to Douglas Ave; thence southeasterly on Douglas Ave to River Ave; thence southerly on River Ave to Admiral St; thence northwesterly on Admiral St to Texas Ave; thence westerly on Texas Ave to Gentian Ave; thence southerly on Gentian Ave to Smith St; thence northwesterly on Smith St to Old Rd; thence westerly on Old Rd to the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Fifth district:
The fifth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at Westminster St and I-95; thence westerly on Westminster St to Bridgham St; thence southerly on Bridgham St to Cranston St; thence southwesterly on Cranston St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Ellery St; thence northerly on Ellery St to Willow St; thence easterly on Willow St to census block 440070013004009; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070013004001 — 440070013004009, 440070013004006 — 440070013004008, and 440070013004000 — 440070013004007 to Messer St; thence northerly on Messer St to Westminster St; thence westerly on Westminster St to State Highway 10; thence northeasterly on State Highway 10 to Atwells Ave; thence westerly on Atwells Ave to Lynch St; thence northerly on Lynch St to Fairview St; thence westerly on Fairview St to Parnell St; thence northerly on Parnell St to Cloud St; thence westerly on Cloud St to Sisson St; thence southerly on Sisson St to Actina St; thence westerly on Actina St to Imera St; thence northerly on Imera St to the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course to Galileo Ave; thence northeasterly on Galileo Ave to Standish Ave; thence northerly on Standish Ave to Rialto St; thence easterly on Rialto St to Mt Pleasant Ave; thence northerly on Mt Pleasant Ave to Old Rd; thence easterly on Old Rd to Smith St; thence southeasterly on Smith St to Gentian Ave; thence northeasterly on Gentian Ave to Texas Ave; thence easterly on Texas Ave to Admiral St; thence southeasterly on Admiral St to River Ave; thence southerly on River Ave to Chalkstone Ave; thence northeasterly on Chalkstone Ave to Lisbon St; thence southeasterly on Lisbon St to Berkley St; thence southwesterly on Berkley St to Robin St; thence southeasterly on Robin St to Prescott St; thence northeasterly on Prescott St to Wolcott St; thence southeasterly on Wolcott St to Valley St; thence northeasterly on Valley St to Pleasant Valley Pkwy; thence southeasterly on Pleasant Valley Pkwy to the Woonasquatucket River; thence easterly on the Woonasquatucket River to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Sixth district:
The sixth senatorial district shall consist of all that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the I-95 ramp and Memorial Blvd; thence southerly on I-95 to Westminster St; thence westerly on Westminster St to Bridgham St; thence southerly on Bridgham St to Cranston St; thence southwesterly on Cranston St to Chapin Ave; thence westerly on Chapin Ave to Messer St; thence southerly on Messer St to Ford St; thence easterly on Ford St to Bucklin St; thence southerly on Bucklin St to Bellevue Ave; thence easterly on Bellevue Ave to Plenty St; thence easterly on Plenty St to Broad St; thence southwesterly on Broad St to Washington Ave; thence easterly on Washington Ave to Michigan Ave; thence northerly on Michigan Ave to census block 440070001011006; thence easterly and northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070001011006 — 440070001011007 to census block 440070001011008; thence northerly and easterly on the western boundary line of census block 440070001011008 to Shipyard St; thence northwesterly on Shipyard St to Ernest St; thence westerly on Ernest St to Allens Ave; thence northerly on Allens Ave to census block 440070006001096; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070006001096 — 440070001011001 on the line extending to the Providence River; thence northwesterly on the Providence River to the Moshassuck River; thence northerly on the Moshassuck River to Charles St; thence northerly on Charles St to Stevens St; thence easterly on Stevens St to Hewes St; thence northeasterly on Hewes St to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to Olney St; thence easterly on Olney St to Camp St; thence northeasterly on Camp St to Carrington Ave; thence easterly on Carrington Ave to Hope St; thence northeasterly on Hope St to Cypress St; thence westerly on Cypress St to Ivy St; thence northerly on Ivy St to Evergreen St; thence westerly on Evergreen St to Camp St; thence northerly on Camp St to Rochambeau Ave; thence westerly on Rochambeau Ave to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to Branch Ave; thence northwesterly on Branch Ave to I-95; thence southerly on I-95 to New York New Haven and Hartford RR; thence southerly on the New York New Haven and Hartford RR to the eastern boundary line of Providence Amtrak Station and Railroad St; thence southwesterly on Railroad St to Exchange St; thence southeasterly on Exchange St to Memorial Blvd; thence westerly on Memorial Blvd to the point of origin.

Seventh district: The seventh senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — Cranston boundary line and Webster Ave; thence northerly on Webster Ave to Plainfield St; thence westerly on Plainfield St to Ralph St; thence northerly on Ralph St to Eastwood Ave; thence westerly on Eastwood Ave to Laurel Hill Ave; thence northerly on Laurel Hill Ave to Hartford Ave; thence easterly on Hartford Ave to US Highway 6; thence southeasterly and northerly on US Highway 6 to Atwells Ave; thence westerly on Atwells Ave to Lynch St; thence northerly on Lynch St to Fairview St; thence westerly on Fairview St to Parnell St; thence northerly on Parnell St to Cloud St; thence westerly on Cloud St to Sisson St; thence southerly on Sisson St to Actina St; thence westerly on Actina St to Imera St; thence northerly on Imera St to the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course; thence northerly on the eastern boundary line of Triggs Memorial Golf Course to Galileo Ave; thence northeasterly on Galileo Ave to Standish Ave; thence northerly on Standish Ave to Rialto St; thence easterly on Rialto St to Mt Pleasant Ave; thence northerly on Mt Pleasant Ave to census block 440070024006004; thence westerly on the northern boundary line of Rhode Island College to the Providence — North Providence boundary line; thence southwesterly on the Providence — North Providence boundary line to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — Johnston boundary line to the Providence — Cranston boundary line; thence easterly on the Providence — Cranston boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventh senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Johnston bounded by a line beginning at the Providence — Johnston boundary line and Plainfield St; thence southerly on Plainfield St to Morgan Ave; thence westerly on Morgan Ave to School St; thence southwesterly on School St to census block 440070125001021; thence northerly on the eastern boundary lines of census blocks 440070125001021 and 440070125001014 to Downing Dr; thence northerly on Downing Dr to Central Ave; thence northeasterly on Central Ave to Alden St; thence northerly on Alden St to Boundary Ave; thence easterly on Boundary Ave to Harding Ave; thence northerly on Harding Ave to York Rd; thence easterly on York Rd to census block 440070124021024; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070124021024 — 440070124021027 and 440070124021024 — 440070124021025 to the Providence — Johnston boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — Johnston boundary line to the point of origin.

Eighth district:
The eighth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line and Ten Mile River; thence northerly on Ten Mile River to utility right of way; thence westerly on utility right of way to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to Loring Pkwy; thence easterly on Loring Pkwy to the western boundary line of Slater Memorial Park, then northerly on the western boundary line of Slater Memorial Park to Slater Park Ave; thence northerly on Slater Park Ave to Waterman St; thence westerly on Waterman St to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to Armistice Blvd; thence westerly on Armistice Blvd to George Bennett Hwy; thence northerly on George Bennett Hwy to Central Ave; thence westerly on Central Ave to N Bend St; thence southerly on N Bend St to Walcott St; thence westerly on Walcott St to I-95; thence southwesterly on I-95 to George St; thence northerly on George St to Park Place W; thence northerly on Park Place W to Main St; thence continuing northerly on Main St and Dexter St to Goff Ave; thence northeasterly on Goff Ave to Exchange St; thence easterly on Exchange St to the Blackstone River; thence northerly on the Blackstone River to the Pawtucket — Central Falls boundary line; thence northerly on the Pawtucket — Central Falls boundary line to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence easterly and southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

Ninth district:
The ninth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of West Warwick bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line and Natick Rd; thence southerly on Natick Rd to Wakefield St; thence southeasterly on Wakefield St to Wilson St; thence southerly on Wilson St to Prospect Hill Ave; thence easterly on Prospect Hill Ave to Providence St; thence southerly on Providence St to New London Ave and the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line; thence southwesterly, easterly, and southerly on the West Warwick — Warwick boundary line to the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line; thence westerly on the West Warwick — East Greenwich boundary line to the West Warwick — Coventry boundary line; thence northerly on the West Warwick — Coventry boundary line to the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line; thence easterly on the Cranston — West Warwick boundary line to the point of origin.

Tenth district:
The tenth senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Warren.

The tenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Bristol bounded by a line beginning at the Bristol — Warren boundary line and Hope St; thence southerly on Hope St to Tupelo St; thence easterly on Tupelo St to Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to Chestnut St; thence westerly on Chestnut St to Sherry Ave; thence southerly on Sherry Ave to Bayview Ave; thence easterly on Bayview Ave to Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to census block 440010309013030; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440010309013030 — 440010309013012 and 440010309013029 — 440010309013005 extending to the Mount Hope Bay and the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line; thence northeasterly on the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line to the Bristol — Warren boundary line; thence northwesterly and westerly on the Bristol — Warren boundary line to the point of origin.

The tenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Tiverton bounded by a line beginning at the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line and the inlet to Nannaquaket Pond; thence southeasterly on the inlet of Nannaquaket Pond to Nannaquaket Rd; thence northeasterly on Nannaquaket Rd to Main Rd; thence southeasterly on Main Rd to Bulgarmarsh Rd; thence northeasterly on Bulgarmarsh Rd to Fish Rd; thence northerly on Fish Rd to State Highway 24; thence northeasterly on State Highway 24 to census block 440050417011014; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050417011011 — 440050417011014 and 440050417011011 — 440050417011021 to census block 440050417011034; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050417011021 — 440050417011034 to Stafford Pond; thence southeasterly and northerly on the shoreline of Stafford Pond to the line extending from Mark Dr; thence easterly on Mark Dr to Stafford Rd; thence northerly on Stafford Rd to Fairwood Dr; thence easterly on Fairwood Dr to the southern segment of Captains Cir; thence easterly on Captains Cir to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence northerly and easterly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Warren — Tiverton boundary line; thence southerly on the Warren — Tiverton boundary line to the point of origin.

Eleventh district:
The eleventh senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Portsmouth.

The eleventh senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Bristol bounded by a line beginning at the line extending from State St and Bristol Harbor; thence easterly on State St to Hope St; thence northerly on Hope St to Chestnut St; thence easterly on Chestnut St to Sherry Ave; thence southerly on Sherry Ave to Bayview Ave; thence easterly on Bayview Ave to Metacom Ave; thence southerly on Metacom Ave to census block 440010309013030; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440010309013030 — 440010309013012 and 440010309013029 — 440010309013005 extending to the Mount Hope Bay and the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line; thence southerly on the Bristol — Tiverton boundary line to the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line; thence southwesterly and northwesterly on the Bristol — Portsmouth boundary line to Bristol Harbor; thence northerly on the shore of Bristol Harbor to the point of origin.

Twelfth district:
The twelfth senatorial district shall consist of all of the town of Middletown.

The twelfth senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Little Compton.

The twelfth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of Tiverton bounded by a line beginning at the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line and the inlet to Nannaquaket Pond; thence southeasterly in the inlet of Nannaquaket Pond to Nannaquaket Rd; thence northeasterly on Nannaquaket Rd to Main Rd; thence southeasterly on Main Rd to Bulgarmarsh Rd; thence northeasterly on Bulgarmarsh Rd to Fish Rd; thence northwesterly on Fish Rd to State Highway 24; thence northeasterly on State Highway 24 to census block 440050417011014; thence southeasterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050417011011 — 440050417011014 and 440050417011011 — 440050417011021 to census block 440050417011034; thence easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440050417011021 — 440050417011034 to Stafford Pond; thence southeasterly and northerly on the shoreline of Stafford Pond to the line extending from Mark Dr; thence easterly on Mark Dr to Stafford Rd; thence northerly on Stafford Rd to Fairwood Dr; thence easterly on Fairwood Dr to the southern segment of Captains Cir; thence easterly on Captains Cir to the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line; thence southerly on the Rhode Island — Massachusetts boundary line to the Tiverton — Little Compton boundary line; thence westerly on the Tiverton — Little Compton boundary line to the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line; thence northerly on the Portsmouth — Tiverton boundary line to the point of origin.

The twelfth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Newport bounded by a line beginning at the Middletown — Newport boundary line and Broadway; thence southerly on Broadway to Vernon Ave; thence southeasterly on Vernon Ave to census block 440050406001017; thence southerly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440050406001017 to Almy St; thence southerly on Almy St to Bliss Rd; thence southwesterly on Bliss Rd to Broadway; thence southerly on Broadway to Cranston Ave; thence easterly on Cranston Ave to Kay St; thence northeasterly on Kay St to Prairie Ave; thence southeasterly on Prairie Ave to Ellery Rd; thence easterly on Ellery Rd to Easton Pond; thence southerly and easterly on the pond shoreline to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence northerly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the point of origin.

Thirteenth district:
The thirteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Newport bounded by a line beginning at the Middletown — Newport boundary line and Broadway; thence southerly on Broadway to Vernon Ave; thence southeasterly on Vernon Ave to census block 440050406001017; thence southerly on the eastern boundary line of census block 440050406001017 to Almy St; thence southerly on Almy St to Bliss Rd; thence southwesterly on Bliss Rd to Broadway; thence southerly on Broadway to Cranston Ave; thence easterly on Cranston Ave to Kay St; thence northeasterly on Kay St to Prairie Ave; thence southeasterly on Prairie Ave to Ellery Rd; thence easterly on Ellery Rd to Easton Pond; thence southerly and easterly on the pond shoreline to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence southerly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the Atlantic Ocean; thence westerly southerly, and northerly on the shoreline to the Middletown — Newport boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Middletown — Newport boundary line to the point of origin.

The thirteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Newport known as Coasters Harbor Island (U.S. Naval Station).

The thirteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of the town of Jamestown.

Fourteenth district: The fourteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of East Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line and Newport Ave; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — East Providence boundary line; thence southerly on the Providence — East Providence boundary line to the line extending from Waterview Ave; thence easterly on the line extending from Waterview Ave to Sunnyside Ave; thence northerly on Sunnyside Ave to Boyden Blvd; thence easterly on Boyden Blvd to Pawtucket Ave; thence southerly on Pawtucket Ave to Village Green N; thence easterly on Village Green N to census block 440070105024003; thence northerly and easterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070105024003 — 440070105024001 to census block 440070105023019; thence northerly and easterly on the western and northern boundary line of census block 440070105023019 to East Shore Expy; thence northerly on East Shore Expy N to I-195; thence westerly on I-195 to Pawtucket Ave; thence northerly on Pawtucket Ave to Centre St; thence northwesterly on Centre St to N Broadway; thence northerly on N Broadway to Geenwood Ave; thence northwesterly on Greenwood Ave to railroad tracks; thence northeasterly on railroad tracks to Pawtucket Ave; thence northwesterly on Pawtucket Ave to Newport Ave; thence northerly on Newport Ave to the point of origin.

Fifteenth district:
The fifteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line and Moshassuck Industrial Hwy; thence southerly on Moshassuck Industrial Hwy to Weeden St; thence easterly on Weeden St to Lorraine St; thence southerly on Lorraine St to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to Church St; thence easterly on Church St to George St; thence southerly on George St to I-95; thence northeasterly on I-95 to Prospect St; thence southeasterly on Prospect St to the utility right of way; thence northeasterly on the utility right of way to census block 440070171003029; thence southerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070171003029 — 440070171003019 to Notre Dame Ave; thence southerly on Notre Dame Ave to Beverage Hill Ave; thence westerly on Beverage Hill Ave to School St; thence southerly on School St to census block 440070171001025; thence westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070171001025 — 440070171001007 to the Seekonk River; thence southerly on the Seekonk River to the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — East Providence boundary line to the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northwesterly on the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence northerly on the North Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line; thence easterly on the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

The fifteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Providence bounded by a line beginning at I-95 and the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line; thence easterly on the Providence — Pawtucket boundary line to Hope St; thence southerly on Hope St to Cypress St; thence westerly on Cypress St to Ivy St; thence northerly on Ivy St to Evergreen St; thence westerly on Evergreen St to Camp St; thence northerly on Camp St to Rochambeau Ave; thence westerly on Rochambeau Ave to N Main St; thence southerly on N Main St to Branch Ave; thence northwesterly on Branch Ave to I-95; thence northerly on I-95 to the point of origin.

Sixteenth district:
The sixteenth senatorial district shall consist of all of the city of Central Falls.

The sixteenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the city of Pawtucket bounded by a line beginning at the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line and Moshassuck Industrial Hwy; thence southerly on Moshassuck Industrial Hwy to Weeden St; thence easterly on Weeden St to Lorraine St; thence southerly on Lorraine St to Mineral Spring Ave; thence easterly on Mineral Spring Ave to Church St; thence easterly on Church St to Park Place W; thence northerly on Park Place W to Main St; thence northerly on Main St and Dexter St to Goff Ave; thence northeasterly on Goff Ave to Exchange St; thence easterly on Exchange St to the Blackstone River; thence northerly on the Blackstone River to the Pawtucket — Central Falls boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Central Falls boundary line to the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line; thence westerly on the Pawtucket — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

Seventeenth district:
The seventeenth senatorial district shall consist of all of that part of the town of Lincoln bounded by a line beginning at the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line and Lonsdale Ave; thence southerly on Lonsdale Ave to Cook St; thence westerly on Cook St to Carrington St; thence southwesterly on Carrington St to Front St; thence southwesterly on Front St to Grove St; thence northwesterly on Grove St to Union St; thence southwesterly on Union St to Pleasant St; thence northerly on Pleasant St to Leicester Dr; thence southwesterly on Leicester Dr to census block 440070117011037; thence southwesterly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070117011037 — 440070117011035 to Sweeney St; thence southwesterly on Sweeney St to River Rd; thence southwesterly on River Rd to Great Rd; thence southerly on Great Rd to Smithfield Ave; thence southerly on Smithfield Ave to Sayesville Pond; thence southeasterly on the eastern shoreline of Sayesville Pond to Walker St; thence easterly on Walker St to Moshassuck Rd; thence southeasterly on Moshassuck Rd to Conduit St; thence northeasterly on the line extending from Conduit St to the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line; thence southerly on the Central Falls — Lincoln boundary line to the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — Pawtucket boundary line to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence westerly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to Wenscott Reservoir; thence northerly on Wenscott Reservoir to census block 440070116002027; thence northerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070116002026 — 440070116002027 to Angell Rd; thence northerly on Angell Rd to Jenckes Hill Rd; thence northwesterly on Jenckes Hill Rd to Limerock Rd; thence westerly on Limerock Rd to the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence northerly on the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line; thence southeasterly on the Cumberland — Lincoln boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventeenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Providence bounded by a line beginning at the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line and State Route 146; thence southerly on State Route 146 to the line extending from Sudbury St; thence westerly on Sudbury St to Augusta Ave; thence northerly on Augusta Ave to Young St; thence westerly on Young St to Palm St; thence northerly on Palm St to Monticello St; thence southwesterly on Monticello St to Woodward Rd; thence southerly on Woodward Rd to Angell Rd; thence westerly on Angell Rd to Benjamin Dr; thence westerly on Benjamin Dr to Evergreen Pkwy; thence northerly on Evergreen Pkwy to census block 440070119022003; thence northerly and westerly on the boundary line between census blocks 440070119022003 — 440070119023000 to Angell Rd; thence northerly on Angell Rd to the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line; thence easterly on the Lincoln — North Providence boundary line to the point of origin.

The seventeenth senatorial district shall also consist of all of that part of the town of North Smithfield bounded by a line beginning at the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line and the Slatersville Reservoir; thence northeasterly on the Slatersville Reservoir to Railroad St; thence northwesterly on Railroad St to Main St; thence easterly on Main St to Greene St; thence northeasterly on Greene St to School St; thence easterly on School St to the utility right of way; thence southeasterly on the utility right of way to Woonsocket Hill Rd; thence northeasterly on Woonsocket Hill Rd to State Route 146A; thence easterly on State Route 146A to the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line; thence easterly on the Woonsocket — North Smithfield boundary line to the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line; thence southerly on the North Smithfield — Lincoln boundary line to the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line; thence westerly on the North Smithfield — Smithfield boundary line to the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line; thence northerly on the Burrillville — North Smithfield boundary line to the point of origin.

Eighteenth district: